Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 40.1 Funds for Nonpublic School Record Keeping

16-40.1-1 — 16-40.1-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

Section

16-40.1-10

, enacted by P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 48, § 1, provides that §§

16-40.1-1

through 16-40.1-9 ( P.L. 1990, ch. 228, § 1), concerning funds for nonpublic school record keeping, are repealed, effective July 1, 1991. See §

16-40.1-10

.

16-40.1-10.
Repeal of provisions.

Effective July 1, 1991, the provisions of §§

16-40.1-1

through 16-40.1-9 are repealed; provided, that the commissioner is authorized and may continue after July 1, 1991 to require data necessary for the calculation of school support programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 48, § 1.